dist/apertium-ido.ido.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
  apertium-ido: Ido morphological dictionary.

  AUTO-GENERATED — do not edit by hand. Regenerate with the
  ido-esperanto-extractor pipeline (scripts/export_apertium.py). Lexical data is
  derived from Wiktionary, Wikipedia/Wikidata interwiki links and a cognate
  aligner; see the extractor for per-entry provenance. Sources are CC BY-SA;
  this dictionary is GPL-3.0.

  Language-specific symbols — Ido productive derivational morphology
  (symbol  =  Ido suffix  ->  Esperanto output; example verb 'krear', noun 'monto'):

    der_act   Ido -ad-  action noun             krear    -> kreado     [n]
    der_pres  Ido -ant- agent / present noun     krear    -> kreanto    [n]
    der_past  Ido -int- past noun                krear    -> kreinto    [n]
    der_ppra  Ido -ant- active present participle krear   -> kreanta    [adj]
    der_ppa   Ido -int- active past participle    krear   -> kreinta    [adj]
    der_pprs  Ido -at-  passive present participle krear  -> kreata     [adj]
    der_ppas  Ido -it-  passive past participle   krear   -> kreita     [adj]
    der_pfut  Ido -ot-  passive future participle krear   -> kreota     [adj]
    der_qual  Ido -es-  abstract quality (from adj) bona  -> boneco     [n]
    der_ala   Ido -al-  relational adjective      ekonomio -> ekonomia  [adj]
    der_oz    Ido -oz-  'full of' adjective       sukceso  -> sukcesa   [adj]
    der_aro   Ido -ar-  collective noun           monto    -> montaro   [n]
    der_aj    Ido -aj-  concrete manifestation    (monodix analysis only)
    der_izar  Ido -iz-  'provide with' verb       (monodix analysis only)
    der_esar  Ido -es-  passive verb formant      (monodix analysis only)
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="cog"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="ciph"/>
    <sdef n="able"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"/>
    <sdef n="act"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="der_pres"/>
    <sdef n="der_act"/>
    <sdef n="der_qual"/>
    <sdef n="der_oz"/>
    <sdef n="der_ala"/>
    <sdef n="der_aro"/>
    <sdef n="der_izar"/>
    <sdef n="der_esar"/>
    <sdef n="der_past"/>
    <sdef n="der_ppa"/>
    <sdef n="der_ppas"/>
    <sdef n="der_pprs"/>
    <sdef n="der_pfut"/>
    <sdef n="der_ppra"/>
    <sdef n="der_aj"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><p><l>ala</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_ala"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oza</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_oz"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izas</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izis</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izos</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izus</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>izez</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_izar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ino</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajo</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_aj"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aji</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_aj"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aro</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_aro"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ari</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="der_aro"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><p><l>eso</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="der_qual"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esi</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="der_qual"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajo</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="der_aj"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aji</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="der_aj"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ebl__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebla</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e><p><l>anto</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_pres"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anti</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_pres"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ado</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_act"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>adi</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_act"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>into</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_past"/><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inti</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_past"/><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_ppa"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ita</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_ppas"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_pprs"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ota</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_pfut"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anta</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_ppra"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esar</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esis</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esos</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esus</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esez</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="der_esar"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Alexander, Iowa"><i>Alexander, Iowa</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Amina Vladikovna Anshbana"><i>Amina Vladikovna Anshban</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apudsule"><i>apudsul</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="axiomala"><i>axiomal</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="balotar"><i>balot</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bergman"><i>bergman</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biliono"><i>biliono</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="bruisetoze"><i>bruisetoz</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cifro"><i>cifro</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="cyberpunk"><i>cyberpunk</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Darya Sergeyevna Yelizarovana"><i>Darya Sergeyevna Yelizarovan</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="decidite"><i>decidit</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="desfaciligar"><i>desfacilig</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i>du</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="egede"><i>eged</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Ekonomio di Kolumbia"><i>Ekonomio di Kolumbia</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ekritar"><i>ekrit</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eskarpoza"><i>eskarpoz</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="exponento"><i>exponento</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="faxe"><i>fax</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fluar"><i>flu</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Freeborn, Minnesota"><i>Freeborn, Minnesota</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Greenville"><i>Greenvill</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="guardala"><i>guardal</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Historio di Centrafrika"><i>Historio di Centrafrika</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="impresesar"><i>impreses</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="interkonsente"><i>interkonsent</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="juntenda"><i>juntend</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Kalmar-uniono"><i>Kalmar-union</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kin"><i>kin</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="kisadar"><i>kisad</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="koakte"><i>koakt</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="krokodilo"><i>krokodil</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunilingar"><i>kuniling</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Lachówka Małana"><i>Lachówka Małan</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lamine"><i>lamin</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="listo"><i>listo</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="Manuel Esquivel"><i>Manuel Esquivel</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mekanisme"><i>mekanism</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Miles, Iowana"><i>Miles, Iowan</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="minus"><i>minus</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="moskizar"><i>moskiz</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Nb"><i>Nb</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noniliardo"><i>noniliardo</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="ofica"><i>ofic</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="okamil"><i>okamil</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="pedirante"><i>pedirant</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Pedro Passos Coelho"><i>Pedro Passos Coelh</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pensionar"><i>pension</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Prichard, Alabamana"><i>Prichard, Alabaman</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="puntizar"><i>puntiz</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="quadriliono"><i>quadriliono</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="quociento"><i>quociento</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="ralf"><i>ralf</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rikontar"><i>rikont</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rosochate"><i>rosochat</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sardiniana"><i>sardinian</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="septiliono"><i>septiliono</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="shameso"><i>shames</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sisamil"><i>sisamil</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="specimenigar"><i>specimenig</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tektoza"><i>tektoz</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Templo Mormona en London"><i>Templo Mormona en London</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tenebroze"><i>tenebroz</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="triamil"><i>triamil</i><par n="num"/></e>
    <e lm="unjuntar"><i>unjunt</i><par n="ar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="Yari 1670ana"><i>Yari 1670an</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
